Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 3

Relations of Partners to Persons Dealing with Partnership

61-1-301. Partner agent of partnership.

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under § 61-1-303:

Each partner is an agent of the partnership for the purpose of its business. An act of a partner, including the execution of an instrument in the partnership name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership binds the partnership, unless the partner had no authority to act for the partnership in the particular matter and the person with whom the partner was dealing knew or had received a notification that the partner lacked authority;

An act of a partner which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership binds the partnership only if the act was authorized by the other partners.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, §§ 5, 9, 10, 23, 25.

Law Reviews.

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).

The Tennessee Corporation Act and Close Corporations for Profit (James S. Covington, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 183.

Vicarious Liability and the Traditional Law Firm Partnership: What You Should Know (Paul S. Davidson), 29 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1993).

61-1-302. Transfer of partnership property.

Partnership property may be transferred as follows:

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under § 61-1-303, partnership property held in the name of the partnership may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by a partner in the partnership name;

Partnership property held in the name of one (1) or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring the property to them of their capacity as partners or of the existence of a partnership, but without an indication of the name of the partnership, may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by the persons in whose name the property is held;

Partnership property held in the name of one (1) or more persons other than the partnership, without an indication in the instrument transferring the property to them of their capacity as partners or of the existence of a partnership, may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by the persons in whose name the property is held.

A partnership may recover partnership property from a transferee only if it proves that execution of the instrument of initial transfer did not bind the partnership under § 61-1-301 and:

As to subsequent transferee who gave value for property transferred under subsection (a)(1) and (2), proves that the subsequent transferee knew or had received a notification that the person who executed the instrument of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the partnership; or

As to a transferee who gave value for property transferred under subsection (a)(3), proves that the transferee knew or had received a notification that the property was partnership property and that the person who executed the instrument of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the partnership.

A partnership may not recover partnership property from a subsequent transferee if the partnership would not have been entitled to recover the property, under subsection (b), from any earlier transferee of the property.

If a person holds all of the partners' interests in the partnership, all of the partnership property vests in that person. The person may execute a document in the name of the partnership to evidence vesting of the property in that person and may file or record the document.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

Cross-References. Conveyances declared fraudulent, § 66-3-309.

61-1-303. Statement of partnership authority.

A partnership may file a statement of partnership authority, which:

Must include:

The name of the partnership;

The street address of its chief executive office (and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the chief executive office) and of one (1) office in this state, if there is one; and

The names of the partners authorized to execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the partnership; and

May state the authority, or limitations on the authority, of some or all of the partners to enter into other transactions on behalf of the partnership and any other matter.

If a filed statement of partnership authority is executed pursuant to § 61-1-105(c) and states the name of the partnership but does not contain all of the other information required by subsection (a), the statement nevertheless operates with respect to a person not a partner as provided in subsections (c) and (d).

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), a filed statement of partnership authority supplements the authority of a partner to enter into transactions on behalf of the partnership as follows:

Except for transfers of real property, a grant of authority contained in a filed statement of partnership authority is conclusive in favor of a person who gives value without knowledge to the contrary, so long as and to the extent that a limitation on that authority is not then contained in another filed statement. A filed cancellation of a limitation on authority revives the previous grant of authority;

A grant of authority to transfer real property held in the name of the partnership contained in a certified copy of a filed statement of partnership authority recorded in the office of the register of deeds in the county where that real property is located is conclusive in favor of a person who gives value without knowledge to the contrary, so long as and to the extent that a certified copy of a filed statement containing a limitation on that authority is not then of record in the office of the register of deeds in the county where that real property is located. The recording in the office of the register of deeds in the county where that real property is located of a certified copy of a filed cancellation of a limitation on authority revives the previous grant of authority.

A person not a partner is deemed to know of a limitation on the authority of a partner to transfer real property held in the name of the partnership if a certified copy of the filed statement containing the limitation on authority is of record in the office for recording transfers of that real property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) and §§ 61-1-704 and 61-1-805, a person not a partner is not deemed to know of a limitation on the authority of a partner merely because the limitation is contained in a filed statement.

Unless earlier canceled, a filed statement of partnership authority is canceled by operation of law five (5) years after the date on which the statement, or the most recent amendment, was filed with the office of the register of deeds or with the secretary of state, as the case may be.

Acts 2001, ch. 353; 2002, ch. 563, § 1; 2014, ch. 783, § 17.

61-1-304. Statement of denial.

A partner or other person named as partner in a filed statement of partnership authority may file a statement of denial stating the name of the partnership and the fact that is being denied, which may include denial of a person's authority or status as a partner. A statement of denial is a limitation on authority as provided in § 61-1-303(c) and (d).

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-305. Partnership liable for partner's actionable conduct.

A partnership is liable for loss or injury caused to a person, or for a penalty incurred, as a result of a wrongful act or omission, or other actionable conduct, of a partner acting in the ordinary course of business of the partnership or with authority of the partnership.

If, in the ordinary course of the partnership's business or while acting with authority of the partnership, a partner receives or causes the partnership to receive money or property of a person not a partner, and the money or property is misapplied by a partner, the partnership is liable for the loss.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, § 26.

Law Reviews.

Consideration in Formation of Contracts in Tennessee (John H. Moore), 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 915.

Fraud Imputation Under Section 523(a)(2)(A): Is a Partner Always Liable for Wrongdoing by the Partnership? (Bernice B. Donald), 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 651 (1994).

Vicarious Liability and the Traditional Law Firm Partnership: What You Should Know (Paul S. Davidson), 29 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1993).

61-1-306. Partner's liability.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b)-(g), all partners are liable jointly and severally for all obligations of the partnership unless otherwise agreed by the claimant or provided by law.

A person admitted as a partner into an existing partnership is not personally liable for any partnership obligation incurred before the person's admission as a partner.

An obligation of a partnership incurred while the partnership is a registered limited liability partnership, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise, is solely the obligation of the partnership. A partner is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for such an obligation solely by reason of being or acting as a partner. This subsection (c) applies notwithstanding anything inconsistent in the partnership agreement that existed immediately before the vote required to become a registered limited liability partnership under § 61-1-1001(b).

Subsection (c) does not affect the liability of a partner in a registered limited liability partnership for the partner's own omissions, negligence, wrongful acts, misconduct or malpractice, or that of any person under the partner's direct supervision and control.

A partner in a registered limited liability partnership is not a proper party to a proceeding by or against a registered limited liability partnership, the object of which is to recover damages or enforce the obligations arising out of the acts, omissions, malpractice or misconduct of the type described in subsection (c), unless the partner is personally liable under subsection (d).

Unless otherwise agreed, a partner who receives a distribution from a registered limited liability partnership or a partner who votes for or assents to the distribution shall have no liability for the distribution under this section or any other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of three (3) years from the date of the distribution.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, each person, partner, or employee required to collect, truthfully account for, and pay over to the department of revenue any tax collected from the customers of a registered limited liability partnership shall be personally liable for such taxes in the same manner as responsible persons of a corporation under the same provisions of § 67-1-1443.

Acts 2001, ch. 353; 2014, ch. 641, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 641, § 2 provided that the limitations on individual partner liability of the act, which amended this section, shall not apply to any obligation, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise, that was incurred or arose prior to July 1, 2014.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, §§ 21, 30, 32, 52, 62.

Law Reviews.

Some Whys and Wherefores in Drafting Shareholder Agreements (Robert L. McMurray), 23 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 19 (1987).

Vicarious Liability and the Traditional Law Firm Partnership: What You Should Know (Paul S. Davidson), 29 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1993).

61-1-307. Actions by and against partnership and partners.

A partnership may sue and be sued in the name of the partnership.

An action may be brought against the partnership and, to the extent not inconsistent with § 61-1-306, any or all of the partners in the same action or in separate actions.

A judgment against a partnership is not by itself a judgment against a partner. A judgment against a partnership may not be satisfied from a partner's assets unless there is also a judgment against the partner.

A judgment creditor of a partner may not levy execution against the assets of the partner to satisfy a judgment based on a claim against the partnership unless the partner is personally liable for the claim under § 61-1-306 and:

A judgment based on the same claim has been obtained against the partnership and a writ of execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part;

The partnership is a debtor in bankruptcy;

The partner has agreed that the creditor need not exhaust partnership assets;

A court grants permission to the judgment creditor to levy execution against the assets of a partner based on a finding that partnership assets subject to execution are clearly insufficient to satisfy the judgment, that exhaustion of partnership assets is excessively burdensome, or that the grant of permission is an appropriate exercise of the court's equitable powers; or

Liability is imposed on the partner by law or contract independent of the existence of the partnership.

This section applies to any partnership liability or obligation resulting from a representation by a partner or purported partner under § 61-1-308.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

61-1-308. Purported partner.

If a person, by words or conduct, purports to be a partner, or consents to being represented by another as a partner, in a partnership or with one (1) or more persons not partners, the purported partner is liable to a person to whom the representation is made, if that person, relying on the representation, enters into a transaction with the actual or purported partnership. If the representation, either by the purported partner or by a person with the purported partner's consent, is made in a public manner, the purported partner is liable to a person who relies upon the purported partnership even if the purported partner is not aware of being held out as a partner to the claimant. If partnership liability results, the purported partner is liable with respect to that liability as if the purported partner were a partner. If no partnership liability results, the purported partner is liable with respect to that liability jointly and severally with any other person consenting to the representation.

If a person is thus represented to be a partner in an existing partnership, or with one (1) or more persons not partners, the purported partner is an agent of persons consenting to the representation to bind them to the same extent and in the same manner as if the purported partner were a partner, with respect to persons who enter into transactions in reliance upon the representation. If all of the partners of the existing partnership consent to the representation, a partnership act or obligation results. If fewer than all of the partners of the existing partnership consent to the representation, the person acting and the partners consenting to the representation are jointly and severally liable.

A person is not liable as a partner merely because the person is named by another in a statement of partnership authority.

A person does not continue to be liable as a partner merely because of a failure to file a statement of dissociation or to amend a statement of partnership authority to indicate the partner's dissociation from the partnership.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (a) and (b), persons who are not partners as to each other are not liable as partners to other persons.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.